Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.450

Joint park and recreation district—Duties of county officers.

For all purposes essential to the maintenance, operation, and administration of a joint park and recreation district, including the apportionment of any funds, the county in which a joint park and recreation district shall be considered as belonging shall be the county containing the largest population of the joint district. Whenever the laws relating to park and recreation districts provide for an action by a county officer, the action, if required to be performed on behalf of a joint park and recreation district, shall be performed by the proper officer of the county to which the joint district belongs, except as otherwise provided by law. This delegation of authority extends but is not limited to:

(1) The declaration by the county legislative authority of the election results, as required by RCW 36.69.080;

(2) The filing of declarations of candidacy with the county auditor under RCW 36.69.090;

(3) The issuance of warrants by the county treasurer under RCW 36.69.150;

(4) The duties of the county treasurer and auditor in the establishment and operation of a local improvement district under RCW 36.69.200, 36.69.220, 36.69.240, and 36.69.300. If the local improvement district is located wholly within any one of the participating counties, then the officers of that county shall perform the duties relating to that local improvement district; and

(5) Receipt by the county treasurer of payments of revenue bonds under RCW 36.69.370.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 11 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 11: See note following RCW 36.69.420.